Tennessee, session 114, HB1518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-907, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new subsection:
(b) If a student is not eligible for a Tennessee HOPE scholarship as an entering
freshman pursuant to subsection (a) based on the student's high school grade point
average or composite ACT score, then the student is eligible for the Tennessee HOPE
scholarship as a transfer student if the student:
(1) Meets the requirements of §§ 49-4-904 and 49-4-905;
(2) Is admitted to and enrolled in an eligible postsecondary institution no
later than six (6) months after obtaining the student's first associate degree or
certificate from an eligible postsecondary institution, as defined in § 49-4-708, as
a Tennessee Promise scholarship student, as defined in § 49-4-708;
(3) Received the Tennessee Promise scholarship, or maintained the
student's eligibility for the scholarship, each semester that the student was
enrolled in the eligible postsecondary institution, as defined in § 49-4-708, at
which the student earned their first certificate or associate degree; and
(4) Achieved a final overall grade point average at the eligible
postsecondary institution, as defined in § 49-4-708, of at least 3.0.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to the 2026-2027 academic year and each academic year thereafter.
HB1518
010659
- 1 -